Illinois, session 104th, SB3230.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Architectural, Engineering, and Land 5Surveying Qualifications Based Selection Act is amended by 6changing Section 80 as follows: 7    (30 ILCS 535/80)  (from Ch. 127, par. 4151-80)8    Sec. 80. Affirmative action. Nothing in this Act shall be 9deemed to prohibit or restrict agencies from establishing or 10maintaining affirmative action contracting goals for 11minorities, or women, veterans, or small business setaside 12programs, now or hereafter established by law, rules and 13regulations, or executive order.14(Source: P.A. 87-673.) 15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 16becoming law.